Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.671

Reports—Advisory boards—Staff.

(1) The rules review committee may make reports from time to time to the members of the legislature and to the public with respect to any of its findings or recommendations. The committee shall keep complete minutes of its meetings.

(2) The committee may establish ad hoc advisory boards, including but not limited to, ad hoc economics or science advisory boards to assist the committee in its rules review functions.

(3) The committee may hire staff as needed to perform functions under this chapter.

[ 1995 c 403 s 505.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.